Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.094

Gubernatorial appointees—Removal prior to confirmation.

Gubernatorial appointees subject to senate confirmation, other than those who serve at the governor's pleasure, may not be removed from office without cause by the governor prior to confirmation except upon consent of the senate as provided for by the rules of the senate.

[ 1981 c 338 s 1.]